California statutes. Public Resources Code
The charges authorized by this article are in addition to any and all charges, taxes, assessments, or licenses of any kind or nature paid by or upon the properties assessed hereunder.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 93.)
-------------------------------------------

3405.

The department shall prescribe the form and contents of all reports for making the charge or for other purposes to carry out the intent and provisions of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 1002, Sec. 8.   (AB 218)   Effective September 30, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3406.

Every person chargeable under this article, shall on or before March 15th of each year, file a report with the department. The report shall show all items of information demanded by the report, which are necessary to carry out this article. The report shall be verified by such person or officer as the department may designate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 529.)
-------------------------------------------

3407.

The department may, for good cause shown, by order entered upon its records, extend for not exceeding thirty days, the time for filing any report required by this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 93.)
-------------------------------------------

3407.5.

If the person filing the report required under Section 3406, by error or otherwise fails to include the full amount of oil or gas production in the report, the department shall make an estimate of the deficit, based on the monthly production reports filed by such person under Section 3227, and add it to the report. The department shall make a reasonable effort to reconcile the yearly report filed under Section 3406 with the data filed on the regular monthly production reports, before proceeding to change the report, but failure to do so shall not invalidate the assessment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 999, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

3408.

(a) If any person chargeable under this article fails or refuses to file with the department, within the time prescribed in this article, the verified report provided for in Section 3406, the department shall note failure or refusal as provided for in Section 3418.

(b) The department shall estimate the amount of oil and gas produced by the person and shall assess the person an assessment based upon the estimated production. A penalty assessment shall be added to the charge pursuant to Section 3420.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 999, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

3410.

The department shall, on or before June 15th of each year, acting in conjunction with the Department of Finance, make an estimate of the amount of money which will be required to carry out the provisions of this chapter, including any adjustments for savings or increased expenditures in the current and prior fiscal years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 112.)
-------------------------------------------

3412.

On or before June 15 of each year, the department shall determine the rate or rates that will produce the sums necessary to be raised as provided in Section 3410. Within the same time, the department shall extend into the proper column of the record of assessments the amount of charges due from each person. The department shall post the information supporting the rate or rates on a publicly available portion of its internet website.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 727, Sec. 9.   (SB 406)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3413.

Between the first of March and the 15th of June in each year, the department shall assess and levy the charges as provided in this article. The assessment shall be made against the person operating the property subject to assessment on the first Monday in March, except that, where the actual operation of any well has changed hands during the period for which the charge is imposed, the charge shall be apportioned to each operator upon the basis of the oil or gas produced during the period, and the lien provided for in Section 3423 shall be a lien against the property of each operator. If the name of the owner is unknown to the department the assessment shall be made against unknown owners.

Clerical errors occurring or appearing in the name of any person whose property is properly assessed and charged, or in the making or extension of any assessment or charge upon the records, which do not affect the substantial rights of the payer, shall not invalidate the assessment or charge.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 529.)
-------------------------------------------

3417.

The notice shall state:

(a) That the assessment of property and levy of charges under this article has been completed.

(b) That the records of assessments containing the charges due will be delivered to the State Controller on the first Monday in July.

(c) That if any person is dissatisfied with the assessment made or charge fixed by the department he may, at any time before the first Monday in July, apply to the Controller to have the assessment or charge corrected in any particular. 

The omission to publish notice shall not affect the validity of any assessment levied pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1049.)
-------------------------------------------

3417.5.

(a) The division shall send a notice to each operator subject to a fee pursuant to Section 3206 by April 1 of each year. The notice shall do both of the following:

(1) Identify the amount of the annual fee due no later than May 1 of that year.

(2) State that if the fee amount in the notice is in error, the operator may apply to the division before May 1 of that year to have the fee amount corrected.

(b) The failure to send a notice shall not affect the validity or amount of the fee owed pursuant to Section 3206.

(c) The notice shall be sent by mail or by
 electronic means deemed appropriate by the division, including, but not limited to, electronic mail or an alternative electronic system that persons opt into for receiving notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 707, Sec. 5.   (AB 896)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3418.

The department shall prepare each year a record called the “Record of Assessments and Charges” in which shall be entered each assessment and levy or charge made by it upon the property assessed and charged under this article, describing the property assessed. The assessments may be classified and entered in such separate parts of the record as the department may prescribe. If such charges and assessments become delinquent as provided in Section 3420 of this code, in addition to the information contained in the “Record of Assessments and Charges” as herein provided, the department shall furnish to the State Controller upon his request the name and address of any owner of property assessed as such name and address last appears in the office of the tax assessor for county in which such land or a major portion thereof is situate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1049.)
-------------------------------------------

3419.

On or before the first of July the department shall deliver to the State Controller the record of assessments and charges, certified to by the director, which certificate shall be substantially as follows: “I, ____, Director of Conservation, do hereby certify that between the first of March and the first of July, 20__, I made diligent inquiry and examination to ascertain all property and persons, firms, corporations and associations subject to assessment as required by the provisions of this chapter, providing for the assessment and collection of charges; that I have faithfully complied with all the duties imposed upon me by law; that I have not imposed any unjust or double assessment through malice or ill will or otherwise; nor allowed any person, firm, corporation, or association, or property to escape a just assessment or charge through favor or regard or otherwise.” Failure to subscribe the certificate to the record of assessments and charges, or any certificate, shall not affect the validity of any assessment or charge.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 562, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

3420.

(a) (1) No charges shall be levied for assessments on oil and gas production of less than ten dollars ($10).

(2) The charges levied for assessments are due and payable on the first of July in each year for assessments of more than ten dollars ($10), but less than five hundred dollars ($500). The charges shall be delinquent if not paid on or before August 15th of each year.

(3) The charges levied for assessments are due and payable on the first of July in each year for assessments of five hundred dollars ($500) or more. One-half of the charges shall be delinquent if not paid on or before August 15th of each year. The remaining one-half of the
 charges shall be delinquent if not paid on or before the first of February of the following year.

(b) Idle well fee charges pursuant to Section 3206 are due and payable as specified pursuant to that section and are immediately delinquent if not paid as required.

(c) Charges to an operator pursuant to Section 3226 for actual or estimated costs to perform work ordered are delinquent if not paid within 30 days after service of the accounting of costs.

(d) Any person who fails to pay any charge within the time required shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the amount due, plus interest at the rate of 112 percent per month, or fraction thereof, computed from the delinquent date of the assessment, idle well fee, or other
 charge pursuant to this chapter until and including the date of payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 707, Sec. 6.   (AB 896)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3421.

Every payment on a delinquent charge shall be applied as follows:

(a) First, to any interest due on the charge.

(b) Second, to any penalty imposed by this part.

(c) The balance, if any, to the charge itself.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 987, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

3423.

(a) If any person fails to pay any charge or penalty imposed under this chapter at the time that it becomes due and payable, the amount thereof, including penalties and interest, together with any costs in addition thereto, shall thereupon be a perfected and enforceable state tax lien. Such a lien is subject to Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 7150) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(b) For the purpose of this section only, “due and payable” means the date the charges required to be paid pursuant to Section 3420 are assessed under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 600, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

3423.2.

A warrant may be issued by the Controller or his or her duly authorized representative for the collection of any charges, interest and penalties and for the enforcement of any such lien directed to the sheriff and shall have the same effect as a writ of execution. It may and shall be levied and sale made pursuant to it in the manner and with the same effect as a levy of and a sale pursuant to a writ of execution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 872, Sec. 127.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

3423.3.

Notwithstanding any provisions of law to the contrary, the owner of said land may redeem from any execution sale within a period of three years upon payment of interest, penalties and charges as provided in the case of other sales of real property under execution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 322.)
-------------------------------------------

3423.4.

The sheriff shall receive, upon the completion of his or her services pursuant to a warrant, and the Controller is authorized to pay to him or her the same fees and commissions and expenses in connection with services pursuant to the warrant as are provided by law for similar services pursuant to a writ of execution; provided, that fees for publication in a newspaper shall be subject to approval by the Controller rather than by the court; the fees, commissions, and expenses shall be an obligation of the person or persons liable for the payment of the charges and may be collected from the person or persons by virtue of the warrant or in any other manner provided in this article for the collection of those charges.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 872, Sec. 128.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

3423.6.

In the event that the lien of the charges, penalties or interest attaches to real property from which the oil or gas is extracted and more than one parcel of property is included within the lien, the Controller may release by certificate pursuant to Section 7174 of the Government Code from the lien of said charges, interest, penalties, and costs, upon payment by the owner of any parcel or parcels of property of his proportionate share of the assessment of the oil or gas extracted from all land included within said lien owned by him.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 600, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

3423.9.

It is expressly provided that the remedies provided herein of the state shall be cumulative and that no action by the Controller shall be construed to be an election on the part of the state, or of any of its officers, to pursue any remedy hereunder to the exclusion of any other remedy for which provision is made in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 322.)
-------------------------------------------

3424.

All charges assessed and levied shall be paid to the State Treasurer upon the order of the Controller. The Controller shall record the payment of any charge.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 529.)
-------------------------------------------

3425.

Errors appearing upon the face of any assessment on the record of assessments, or overcharges may be corrected by the Controller, with the consent of the Department of Finance, in such manner as the Controller and the Department of Finance agree upon.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 93.)
-------------------------------------------

3426.

The Controller shall, on or before the thirtieth day of May next following the delinquency of any charge, bring an action in the name of the people of the State, in the county in which the property assessed is situated, to collect any delinquent charges or assessments, together with any penalties or costs, which have not been paid and which are shown as delinquent upon the record of assessments and charges.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 579.)
-------------------------------------------

3427.

The Attorney General shall commence and prosecute any such action to final judgment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 349, Sec. 5.   (AB 3257)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

3428.

In such actions the record of assessments and charges, or a copy of so much thereof as is applicable, duly certified by the Controller, showing unpaid charges against any person assessed by the department, is prima facie evidence of the assessment, the delinquency, the amount of charges, penalties, and costs due and unpaid, that the person is indebted to the people of the State of California in the amount of charges and penalties therein appearing unpaid, and that all forms of law in relation to the assessment of the charges have been complied with.

The provisions of the Code of Civil Procedure relating to service of summons, pleadings, proofs, trials, and appeals are applicable to the proceedings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 579.)
-------------------------------------------

3429.

Payment of the penalties and charges, or the amount of the judgment recovered in the action, shall be made to the State Treasurer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 93.)
-------------------------------------------

3430.

Any person claiming and protesting that the assessment made or charges assessed against him are void, in whole or in part, may bring an action against the State Treasurer for the recovery of the whole or any part of the charges, penalties, or costs paid on such assessment, upon the grounds stated in his protest. No action may be brought later than the third Monday in February next following the day upon which the charges were due, and unless the person has filed with the State Controller, at the time of payment of the charges, a written protest stating whether the whole assessment or charge is claimed to be void, or if a part only, what part, and the grounds upon which the claim is founded. When so paid under protest the payment shall not be regarded as voluntary.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 93.)
-------------------------------------------

3431.

Whenever an action is commenced under the provisions of Section 3430, a copy of the complaint and of the summons shall be served upon the treasurer or his deputy and upon the supervisor or his deputy and upon the Attorney General or his deputy. At the time the treasurer demurs or answers, he may demand that the action be tried in the Superior Court of the County of Sacramento, which demand shall be granted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1670.)
-------------------------------------------

3432.

(a) The Attorney General shall defend the action.

(b) The provisions of the Code of Civil Procedure relating to pleadings, proofs, trials, and appeals are applicable to these proceedings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 215.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

3433.

Failure to begin the action within the time specified in section 3430 is a bar to recovery of the charges. In any such action the court may render judgment for the plaintiff for any part or portion of the charge, penalties, or costs found to be void and paid by plaintiff upon the assessment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 93.)
-------------------------------------------

3434.

(a) If the department determines between June 15, 2024, and March 1, 2025, that the estimate made pursuant to Section 3410 of the amount of money that will be required to carry out the provisions of this chapter is insufficient for the current fiscal year, the department may assess and levy a supplemental assessment on oil and gas production to ensure that funds are available for the full amount of the adjusted cost estimate. The department shall not issue a supplemental assessment pursuant to this section after March 1, 2025.

(b) Issuance of a supplemental assessment shall not affect the requirements and authorities for collecting unpaid assessments on oil and gas pursuant to this article. If the total amount collected under the assessment
 and any supplemental assessments exceed the total amount required to carry out the provisions of this chapter for the fiscal year, the excess shall be carried forward to reduce the assessment for the following year as an adjustment for savings pursuant to Section 3410.

(c) If a supplemental assessment is issued pursuant to this section, the charges shall be computed in accordance with Sections 3402 and 3403, and the supplemental assessment shall be issued and collected in accordance with the requirements and authorities of this article with the following exceptions:

(1) The department shall not assess and levy a supplemental assessment until at least 15 days after mailing notice of a pending supplemental assessment to each person subject to assessment pursuant to Section 3413. The requirement to assess and levy charges between March 1 and June 15 pursuant to Section 3413 does not
 apply to a supplemental assessment, but the department shall otherwise assess and levy the supplemental assessment in accordance with Section 3418.

(2) The department shall provide the Controller with an update to the “Record of Assessments and Charges” required pursuant to Section 3418 to include the supplemental assessment.

(3) The certificate delivered to the Controller in the previous year pursuant to Section 3419 may be relied upon for a supplemental assessment and an additional certificate is not required.

(4) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 3420, charges under a supplemental assessment are due and payable 15 days after the assessment is mailed and shall be delinquent if not paid within 90 days after it is due and payable. Penalties described in subdivision (d) of Section 3420 shall apply to
 delinquent charges under a supplemental assessment.

(5) The Controller’s collection action pursuant to Section 3426 for charges under a supplemental assessment shall be brought within 120 days after the charge under the supplemental assessment becomes delinquent.

(6) An action pursuant to Section 3430 for the recovery of the whole, or any part of, the charges, penalties, or costs paid on a supplemental assessment pursuant to this section may be brought no later than the third Monday following the day upon which the charges became delinquent. The requirements of Section 3430 shall otherwise apply to an action for the recovery of the whole or any part of the charges, penalties, or costs paid on a supplemental assessment pursuant to this section.

(d) This section shall remain in effect only until January
 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (d), the department may continue to pursue the collection of unpaid supplemental assessments, penalties, and interest after this section is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 1002, Sec. 9.   (AB 218)   Effective September 30, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Recommendation of Maximum Efficient Rates of Production [3450. - 3451.]

3450.

The Legislature takes notice of the existence of the Conservation Committee of California Oil Producers and of the fact that said committee for a number of years last past, in the interest of the conservation of oil and gas, has made recommendations of maximum efficient rates of production and for the intrapool distribution of such maximum efficient rates of production with respect to oil pools, capacity production from which pools would result in a loss of ultimate production. The Legislature declares that recommendations for such purpose are in the interest of the conservation of the oil and gas resources of this State and that it is lawful for said committee or any other committee of oil producers to issue such recommendations as to any such oil pool and for producers of oil to comply therewith or to agree to comply therewith, provided:

(a) Copies of all such recommendations shall be currently delivered to the supervisor and shall be open to public inspection in the office of the supervisor; and

(b) Any such committee shall make available to the supervisor its records, files, minutes, reports and other data pertaining to such recommendations.

The supervisor in his discretion may join in any such recommendations or may express his disapproval thereof.

The supervisor, in the absence of such recommendations by a committee of oil producers with respect to any of such pools, or if the supervisor deems any such recommendations to be insufficient or incorrect, may issue recommendations with respect to any such pools on said subject matter, and it shall be lawful for producers to comply therewith or to agree to comply therewith. Neither a disapproval by the supervisor nor a recommendation by him shall constitute a basis for implying any obligation for producers of oil to comply with such a disapproval or recommendation.

Nothing herein contained shall be deemed to permit the production of gas in violation of Articles 5 and 6 of Chapter 1 and Chapter 2 of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 258.)
-------------------------------------------

3451.

“Maximum Efficient Rate,” commonly referred to as “MER,” is defined as the highest daily rate of production which can be sustained economically from a particular pool, from existing wells and facilities, for a reasonable period without loss of economically recoverable ultimate production of oil from such pool.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 437.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Used Oil Recycling Act [3460. - 3473.]

3460.

(a) As used in this article:

(1) “Used oil” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 25250.1 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) “Recycle” means to prepare used oil for reuse as a petroleum product by refining, reclaiming, reprocessing, or other means, in order to attain the standards specified by paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 25250.1 of the Health and Safety Code. “Recycle” does not include the application of used oil to roads for the purpose of dust control or to the ground for the purpose of weed abatement. “Recycle” does not include incineration or burning of used oil as a fuel.

(3) “Board” means the California Integrated Waste Management Board.

(4) “Person” means any individual, private or public corporation, partnership, limited liability company, cooperative, association, estate, municipality, political or jurisdictional subdivision, or government agency or instrumentality.

(b) The amendments made to this section by Chapter 1123 of the Statutes of 1987 do not affect the validity of any existing regulations of the Department of Toxic Substances Control relating to the management of used oil blended or diluted with virgin oil or any partially refined oil product as a hazardous waste, and do not affect the authority of the Department of Toxic Substances Control to prohibit blending or diluting used oil with an uncontaminated product to achieve the standards for recycled oil, as specified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 25250.1 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 343, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

3462.

The Legislature finds that almost 100 million gallons of used automotive and industrial oil are generated each year in the state; that used oil is a valuable petroleum resource which can be recycled; and that, in spite of this potential for recycling, significant quantities of used oil are wastefully disposed of or improperly used by means which pollute the water, land, and air and endanger the public health and welfare.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1158.)
-------------------------------------------

3463.

It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this article that used oil shall be collected and recycled to the maximum extent possible, by means which are economically feasible and environmentally sound, in order to conserve irreplaceable petroleum resources, preserve and enhance the quality of natural and human environments, and protect public health and welfare.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1158.)
-------------------------------------------

3465.

The board shall conduct a public education program to inform the public of the needs for and benefits of collecting and recycling used oil in order to conserve resources and preserve the environment. As part of this program, the board shall:

(a) Adopt rules, in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 3470, requiring any person who sells to a consumer more than 500 gallons of lubricating or other oil annually in containers for use off the premises to inform purchasers by posting at or near the point of purchase the locations of conveniently located collection facilities.

Such rules shall provide that in a county wherein 5 percent or more of the population, as determined in accordance with the latest Bureau of the Census information, speak a specific primary language other than English, the signs shall be in such other language, as well as English.

(b) Establish, maintain, and publicize a used oil information center that shall explain local, state, and federal laws and regulations governing used oil and inform holders of quantities of used oil on how and where used oil may be properly disposed.

(c) Encourage the establishment of voluntary used oil collection and recycling programs and provide technical assistance and, whenever possible, financial assistance, to persons organizing such programs.

(d) Encourage the procurement of rerefined automotive and industrial oils for all state and local uses, whenever such rerefined oils are available at prices competitive with those of new oil produced for the same purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1158.)
-------------------------------------------

3466.

(a) The board shall prescribe guidelines for providing safe and conveniently located facilities for the deposit of used oil by persons possessing not more than five gallons at one time at no cost to those persons.

(b) The improper disposal of used oil pursuant to Section 25250.5 of the Health and Safety Code is prohibited and is subject to penalties pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 25180) of Chapter 6.5 of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 871, Sec. 4.5.)
-------------------------------------------

3469.

The board, and every state officer and employee, shall encourage the purchase of recycled oil products represented as substantially equivalent to products made from new oil in accordance with Section 3471.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1158.)
-------------------------------------------

3470.

(a) All rules and regulations of the board shall be adopted, amended, and repealed in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) The board shall coordinate activities and functions with all other state agencies, including, but not limited to, the Department of Toxic Substances Control, the Department of Water Resources, and the State Water Resources Control Board, in order to avoid duplication in reporting and information gathering.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 343, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

3473.

If any provision of this article or the application of it to any person or circumstance is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this article which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this article are severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1158.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 1.5. Used Oil Collection Demonstration Program [3475. - 3494.]



  ARTICLE 1. Short Title and Definitions [3475. - 3479.]

3475.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Used Oil Collection Demonstration Grant Program Act of 1990.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1657, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

3476.

The definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1657, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

3477.

“Administrative costs” means those costs directly associated with regulation of the implementation of a used oil collection project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1657, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

3477.1.

“Board” means the California Integrated Waste Management Board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1657, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

3477.5.

“Capital outlay” means those costs directly associated with the purchase of equipment necessary to implement a used oil collection project. The costs may include, but are not limited to, the cost of material and labor associated with the installation of that equipment. Capital outlay does not include land acquisition costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1657, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

3478.

“Local agency” means a city, county, or city and county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1657, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

3479.

“Used oil collection project” means a project undertaken by a local agency to encourage the collection, recycling, and proper disposal of used oil generated at households. “Used oil collection project” includes, but is not limited to, integration of used oil collection into existing curbside collection programs, retrofitting of solid waste collection equipment to promote curbside collection programs, and a public education and awareness program to promote opportunities for, and to educate the public as to the benefits from, the recycling of used oil.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1657, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Grants for Used Oil Collection Demonstration Projects [3480. - 3490.]

3480.

(a) The board shall develop and administer a used oil grant program. The board shall adopt regulations for the administration of this chapter and make grant applications available. 

(b) The board shall adopt emergency regulations for the administration of this chapter in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The regulations shall be deemed to be emergency regulations, and shall be considered by the Office of Administrative Law as necessary for the immediate preservation of public peace, health and safety, or general welfare.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 586, Sec. 1.   Effective October 7, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

3481.

The purpose of the used oil collection demonstration grant program is to encourage the establishment of public used oil collection projects and to provide capital outlay and other costs to provide households with the capability of collection used oil generated in those households and to encourage the collection, recycling, and proper disposal of used oil.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1657, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

3482.

(a) A local agency shall not use more than 5 percent of any grant for administrative costs.

(b) The board shall not use more than 10 percent of funds made available for the grant program under this chapter for administrative costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1657, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

3483.

The board shall establish criteria for the granting of funds for used oil collection projects conducted by local agencies, including, but not limited to, information relating to proposed project costs and capital outlay.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1657, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

3484.

(a) Local agencies which have established public used oil curbside collection projects on or before January 1, 1991, are eligible for grants under this article to expand and upgrade those projects. Grant funds shall not be utilized to replace current funding sources.

(b) The grant to any local government shall not exceed seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) per grant. Local agencies may pool their grant funds to implement coordinated or complementary used oil collection projects.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1657, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

3485.

Grant funds shall be made available on a competitive basis to local agencies if requests for grants exceed available funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1657, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

3485.5.

The following criteria shall be used to evaluate grant applications:

(a) The need for a used oil collection project within a jurisdiction.

(b) The commitment of local agency funds to the used oil collection project. 

(c) The commitment of the local agency to continue the used oil collection project after state funding has expired.

(d) The consideration given to a curbside used oil collection program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1657, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

3486.

The board shall determine the contents of grant applications and the methods for evaluating the applications.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1657, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

3487.

The board shall evaluate each grant application for its potential to satisfy the requirements of this chapter and shall award the grant based on the evaluation. The board shall notify the applicant of the approval or denial of the grant application on or before January 1, 1992.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 3787 by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1091, Sec. 127.)
-------------------------------------------

3489.

A local agency that establishes or otherwise expends grant funds provided pursuant to this chapter shall:

(a) Comply with the requirements in the regulations concerning notification and reporting. 

(b) Provide adequate containment capacity for the containers or tanks used to store used oil in the case of a leak or spill. 

(c) Provide sufficient security for centers to minimize vandalism and improper disposal of hazardous substances into used oil containers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 586, Sec. 2.   Effective October 7, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

3490.

Storage containers, such as drums and tanks, used to store used oil shall be in good condition and shall meet any applicable design and construction standards.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1657, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Financing [3491. - 3494.]

3491.

There is hereby created in the State Treasury the Used Oil Collection Demonstration Grant Fund. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the money in the Used Oil Collection Demonstration Grant Fund is continuously appropriated to the board for the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1657, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

3492.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 13340 and 16361 of the Government Code, and to the extent permitted by federal law, the sum of one million dollars ($1,000,000) of money in the Federal Trust Fund, created pursuant to Section 16360 of the Government Code, received by the state from federal oil overcharge funds in the Petroleum Violation Escrow Account, is hereby transferred to the Used Oil Collection Demonstration Grant Fund.

(b) No grant shall be made by the board from funds appropriated pursuant to subdivision (a) unless an amount equal to 50 percent of the costs of the project is made available to the applicant from other public or private sources for the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1657, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

3494.

Funds transferred from the Petroleum Violation Escrow Account by this article shall be transferred by the Controller, subject to approval by the Director of Finance as to which court judgment or federal agency order is the proper source of those funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1657, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Wasting of Natural Gas [3500. - 3503.]

3500.

All persons, firms, corporations, and associations are prohibited from wilfully permitting natural gas wastefully to escape into the atmosphere.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 93.)
-------------------------------------------

3501.
